Hawaii statutes.
[§431K-1.5] Financial responsibility.
Whenever pursuant to the laws of this State or any county of this State a
demonstration of financial responsibility is required as a condition for
obtaining a license or permit to undertake specified activities, if any such
requirement may not be satisfied by obtaining insurance from an insurance
company not authorized in this State, then such requirement may not be
satisfied by purchasing insurance from a risk retention group not chartered in
this State. [L 1989, c 272, §1]

Previous
Vol09_Ch0431-0435H
Next